Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 6 Fees
While the county was liable for the clerk's fee for oaths administered to regular jurors, if a juror was called for a particular case, the oaths administered to him were chargeable to the case. Logan County v. Trimm, 57 Ark. 487, 22 S.W. 164 (1893) (decision under prior law).

When court ordered summons issued for jury commissioners, the clerk could charge the same to county as for summons. Logan County v. Trimm, 57 Ark. 487, 22 S.W. 164 (1893) (decision under prior law).

The circuit clerk was entitled to his fee for copies of order of court appointing jury commissioners, chargeable to the county. Logan County v. Trimm, 57 Ark. 487, 22 S.W. 164 (1893) (decision under prior law).

The clerk was entitled to a fee for entering every order with reference to the grand and petit juries, to be paid by the county. Logan County v. Trimm, 57 Ark. 487, 22 S.W. 164 (1893) (decision under prior law).

In suit to foreclose and enforce lien for delinquent improvement taxes where clerk signed, sealed, and delivered to the sheriff numerous summonses, clerk and stenographer were each entitled to a fee for each summons, and the fact that they were printed made no difference. Sebastian Bridge Dist. v. Lynch, 200 Ark. 134, 138 S.W.2d 81 (1940) (decision under prior law).

Decree allowing fees of clerk and stenographer for summons which had been constructively served and disallowing fees for those personally served was unauthorized, since the fee was not dependent upon manner in which sheriff served the summons. Sebastian Bridge Dist. v. Lynch, 200 Ark. 134, 138 S.W.2d 81 (1940) (decision under prior law).

Where the attorney in the case had the transcript typewritten, gave it to the clerk of court, who checked, corrected, and certified to it, this constituted making and preparing by the clerk within the meaning of this section. McCourtney v. Morrow, 216 Ark. 959, 229 S.W.2d 124 (1950).

The fees to be charged by the circuit court clerks of this state to the Department of Finance and Administration shall be as follows:

(1)The uniform filing fees to be charged by the clerks of the circuit courts for initiating or reopening a cause of action in the circuit courts in the state shall be as prescribed in this section.

The uniform filing fees are:

A fee shall not be charged or collected by the clerks of the circuit courts when the court, by order, pursuant to Rule 72 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure, allows an indigent person to prosecute a cause of action in forma pauperis.

An initial filing fee shall not be charged for domestic violence petitions filed pursuant to § 9-15-201 et seq. Established filing fees may be assessed pursuant to § 5-26-310 and § 9-15-202(b) and (c).

(1)(A)The fee established in subdivision (b)(3) of this section shall be assessed and collected by the circuit clerk to reopen a cause of action in which a final order has been entered, so long as the new claim involves the same parties and the same issues as were present in the initial cause of action.

Otherwise, the circuit clerk shall assess and collect the fee established in subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

A fee shall not be charged or collected by the clerks of the circuit courts for reopening a cause of action in the circuit court under the following circumstances:

Application is made for revocation of conditional release of insanity acquittees under § 5-2-316;

An agreed order or an order of income withholding is presented to be filed, and a service of process is not required; or

A party to the original cause of action for whom a judgment for monetary damages was entered attempts to enforce the monetary judgment by filing a pleading or through other court action, if the pleading is filed or court action is taken within twelve (12) months of issuance of the final judgment in the case.

A county shall not authorize, and a circuit court clerk shall not assess or collect, any other filing fees than those authorized by this section unless specifically provided by state law.

The circuit court may waive the filing fee in cases of involuntary admission upon a finding that the petition is being brought for the benefit of the respondent and it would be inequitable to require the petitioner to pay the fee.

As used in this section, “circuit court clerk” means the circuit clerk and, with respect to probate matters, any county clerk who serves as ex officio clerk of the probate division of the circuit court.

When a statutory cause of action waives the payment of a filing fee, no other claim for relief shall be brought in that action.

To assert another claim:

A separate case shall be opened;

A new case number shall be assigned; and

A filing fee shall be assessed.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment added (b)(4).

The 2003 amendment by Nos. 1185 and 1765 deleted “and chancery” following “circuit” throughout the section; rewrote (b) and (e); deleted “or chancery” following “circuit' in (f); added (g) and (h); and made stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment by 65 substituted “$125.00” for “$100.00” in (b)(1).

The 2005 amendment by 431 substituted “$140.00” for “$125.00” in (b)(1).

The 2005 amendment by 1893 substituted “50.00” for “30.00” in (b)(2).

The 2009 amendment substituted “$150.00” for “$140.00” in (b)(1) and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2013 amendment substituted “9-15-202(b) and (c)” for “9-15-202(c)” in (d); rewrote (e); added (i); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment, added (e)(2)(C), and made a stylistic change.

Cross References. Legislative intent of Acts 1997, No. 1341, §16-10-601.

Legislative intent of Acts 1997, No. 788, §16-10-601.

Transition to state funding, §§16-87-301 and16-87-302.

The filing fee charged for appealing to the circuit court is collected no matter whether the defendant is tried by a jury or by the judge or even if the prosecution ends without any trial at all. Neeley v. Barber, 288 Ark. 384, 706 S.W.2d 358 (1986).

In Arkansas, filing fees and service fees for subpoenas are authorized by statute; thus, the trial court was correct in assessing these costs. Wood v. Tyler, 317 Ark. 319, 877 S.W.2d 582 (1994).

Filing an appeal from municipal court is “initiating a cause of action” in the circuit court under this section so that an advance fee must be paid under §21-6-402. Neeley v. Barber, 288 Ark. 384, 706 S.W.2d 358 (1986).

Cited: Courtney v. Butt, 264 Ark. 475, 572 S.W.2d 407 (1978).

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning circuit, chancery, and probate court clerks' additional advance fee and additional circuit court clerks' fees in certain cases, were repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1256, § 20, as amended by Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 13, § 4. The sections were derived from the following sources: